Utah statutes.
3-1-13.8.   Director committees.
(1) (a)  Unless otherwise provided by the articles of incorporation or bylaws,
a board of directors may create one or more committees and appoint members of
the board of directors to serve on them.
(b)  Each committee shall have two or more members who serve at the discretion
of the board of directors.
(2)  The creation of a committee and appointment of members to it shall be
approved by the greater of:
(a)  a majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken; or
(b)  the number of directors required by the articles of incorporation or
bylaws to take action under Section 3-1-13.6.
(3)  Sections 3-1-13.2 and 3-1-13.6 shall apply to committees and their
members.
(4)  The board of directors, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws may
provide the scope of the authority that each committee may exercise.
(5)  The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee
does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of
conduct described in Section 3-1-13.3.
